West Virginia, session 2026, HB4723.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 14. MISCELLANEOUS RULES. §17C-14-16. Prohibition of "squatted" vehicles. (a) Effective July 1, 2026, it shall be illegal to operate a "squatted" vehicle on West Virginia roads.(b) "Squatted" vehicles include those with a front or rear fender raised four or more inches higher than the other.(c) West Virginia law enforcement shall only issue warning citations for the first six months after the effective date.(d) On January 1, 2027, drivers shall begin to receive tickets for violations. The following penalties for violations are established:(1) First Offense - $100 fine;(2) Second Offense - $200 fine; and(3) Third Offense - $300 fine and a license suspension by the West Virginia Division of Motor Vehicles for twelve months from the date of conviction.